District of Columbia statutes.
15-352

Filing and status of foreign judgments.

A copy of any foreign judgment authenticated in accordance with the laws of the District may be filed in the Office of the Clerk of the Superior Court (“Clerk”). A foreign judgment filed with the Clerk shall have the same effect and be subject to the same procedures, defenses, or proceedings for reopening, vacating, or staying as a judgment of the Superior Court and may be enforced or satisfied in the same manner.

History

Oct. 2, 1990, D.C. Law 8-173, § 2(b), 37 DCR 5005

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-352.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2 of the Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act (1964).